Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6584YH (2) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2455 Section 1. REPEAL. Chapters 146C and 146E, Code 2026, are 1 repealed. 2 EXPLANATION 3 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 4 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 5 This bill repeals Code chapters 146C and 146E, relating 6 to the prohibition on the performance of an abortion by a 7 physician after the detection through prescribed testing of a 8 fetal heartbeat. 9 -1- LSB 6584YH (2) 91 ak/ko 1/ 1